Utah statutes.
11-40-104.   Written notice to person whose employment is denied or
terminated -- Right to respond and seek review.
If a public water utility denies or terminates the employment of a person
because of information obtained through a criminal background check under this
chapter, the public water utility shall:
(1)  notify the person in writing of the reasons for the denial or
termination; and
(2)  give the person an opportunity to respond to the reasons and to seek
review of the denial or termination through administrative procedures
established by the public water utility.
